District of Columbia statutes.
3-1108

Notice of Commission and Committee meetings; minutes.

At least 15 days notice to the public of meetings of the Commission and the Committee shall be provided by advertising in at least 3 local newspapers, through public service announcements, and publication in the District of Columbia Register. Copies of the minutes of meetings of the Commission and the Committee shall be provided on a quarterly basis to each member of the Council and the Mayor.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-183, § 9, 32 DCR 841

Cross References

Health maintenance organizations, “provider” defined, see § 31-3401.
Health-care and community residence facilities, personnel criminal background checks, see § 44-552.
Human tissue banks, transfer of blood components within District, authority of licensed blood banks, see § 7-1541.08.
Injuries caused by firearms or other dangerous weapons, reports by physicians and institutions, requirements, see § 7-2601.
Medical records, “health professional” defined, see § 44-801.
Neglected children, persons required to make reports, procedure, see § 4-1321.02.
Non-health related occupations, licensure, certification, and registration criteria, see § 47-2853.02.
Presidential inaugural ceremonies, authorization of appropriations, see § 2-810.
Substance abuse, prevention program, financial assistance, see § 44-1205.
Substance abuse, treatment and prevention, “qualified health professional” defined, see § 44-1201.
Workers’ compensation, “physician” defined, see § 32-1501.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3108.